Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.030

Powers and duties—Peace officers.

The chief and other officers of the Washington state patrol shall have and exercise, throughout the state, such police powers and duties as are vested in sheriffs and peace officers generally, and such other powers and duties as are prescribed by law.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.43.030. Prior: 1933 c 25 s 2; RRS s 6362-60.]

NOTES:

General authority law enforcement agency: RCW 10.93.020.